Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5330.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 16. (1) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, a public entity or a person
contracting with a public entity shall not procure, purchase,
operate, or deploy a small unmanned aircraft system unless the
small unmanned aircraft system complies with the requirements of
this section.
(2) All of the following requirements apply to small unmanned
aircraft systems described in subsection (1):
(a) All video footage, photographs, telemetry data, and
JJR H03696'25 (H-1) os6wi9


personally identifiable information including, but not limited to,
names, addresses, and other identifying details, collected,
transmitted, or stored must be collected, transmitted, or stored
only within the United States and must be managed in compliance
with federal and state privacy laws, cybersecurity standards, and
guidelines issued by the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security
Agency and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b) Must use end-to-end encryption for data-at-rest and data-
in-transit using AES-256 encryption and transport layer security
protocols to prevent unauthorized access.
(c) Must operate on a secured, segmented network to mitigate
cybersecurity risks.
(d) Must require multifactor authentication and role-based
access controls to limit access.
(e) Must incorporate tamper-proof hardware to prevent
unauthorized modifications.
(f) Must utilize automatic deletion policies ensuring data
removal within 45 days unless otherwise specified by law
enforcement or public safety agencies.
(g) Must incorporate real-time monitoring systems capable of
detecting unauthorized access, cyber threats, or operational
anomalies, with automated countermeasures deployed as necessary.
(3) A public entity or person contracting with a public entity
using a small unmanned aircraft system must conduct security audits
annually and demonstrate compliance with all of the following
cybersecurity standards:
(a) The National Institute of Standards and Technology
Cybersecurity Framework 2.0.
(b) ISO 27001.
JJR H03696'25 (H-1) os6wi9


(c) SOC 2.
(4) The department of state police shall establish regulations
or guidance for implementing this section, including, but not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) Required security assessments for all small unmanned
aircraft systems.
(b) Privacy protection measures and compliance verification.
(c) Network security controls and intrusion detection
standards.
(d) Cybersecurity training requirements for small unmanned
aircraft system operators.
(e) Enforcement mechanisms ensuring that any small unmanned
aircraft system that does not meet the requirements of this section
is disqualified from use by a public entity or a person contracting
with a public entity.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Public entity" means that term as defined in section 1 of
1968 PA 317, MCL 15.321.
(b) "Small unmanned aircraft system" means a powered aircraft
that meets both of the following:
(i) Operates without direct human intervention from within or
on the aircraft.
(ii) Has a total weight, including any attached or carried
components, of less than 55 pounds.
Final Page
JJR H03696'25 (H-1) os6wi9